Texas, session 891, SB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  TRUSTEED PROGRAMS WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR: FEMA MATCH AND DISASTER FUNDS. The amount of $200,000,000 is appropriated from the economic stabilization fund to the Trusteed Programs within the Office of the Governor for the two-year period beginning on the effective date of this Act to be used: (1)  to match federal money received related to disaster response, relief, and recovery; and (2)  for the disaster needs of this state in a manner consistent with Strategy A.1.1, Disaster Funds, as listed in Chapter 1170 (H.B. 1), Acts of the 88th Legislature, Regular Session, 2023 (the General Appropriations Act), and Chapter 1185 (S.B. 1), Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025 (the General Appropriations Act). SECTION 2.  TRUSTEED PROGRAMS WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR: LOCAL GRANTS. The amount of $50,000,000 is appropriated from the economic stabilization fund to the Trusteed Programs within the Office of the Governor for the two-year period beginning on the effective date of this Act to be used for the purpose of making grants to assist counties, municipalities, or other local governments operating within Bandera, Bexar, Burnet, Caldwell, Coke, Comal, Concho, Edwards, Gillespie, Guadalupe, Hamilton, Kendall, Kerr, Kimble, Kinney, Lampasas, Llano, Mason, Maverick, McCulloch, Menard, Real, Reeves, San Saba, Schleicher, Sutton, Tom Green, Travis, Uvalde, or Williamson County, as provided by the governor's declaration of disaster on July 4, 2025, regarding a heavy rainfall and flooding event and the subsequent amendments to that declaration, in establishing and implementing a system of flood warning sirens and rain gauges and purchasing other related equipment. SECTION 3.  TRUSTEED PROGRAMS WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR: METEOROLOGICAL FORECASTING. The amount of $24,000,000 is appropriated from the economic stabilization fund to the Trusteed Programs within the Office of the Governor for the two-year period beginning on the effective date of this Act to be used for the purpose of providing disaster preparedness grants for enhanced atmospheric measurement and modeling techniques to improve meteorological forecasting, enhance weather intelligence and forecasting accuracy, and improve flood management and timeliness of flood warnings in the Texas Hill Country. SECTION 4.  TRUSTEED PROGRAMS WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR: SWIFT WATER TRAINING FACILITY.  The amount of $20,000,000 is appropriated from the economic stabilization fund to the Trusteed Programs within the Office of the Governor for the two-year period beginning on the effective date of this Act to be used for the purpose of providing grants to the Harris Fort Bend Emergency Services District No. 100 for a swift water training facility for operation and rescue to prepare first responders. SECTION 5.  LIMITATION, REPORTING, AND TRANSFER PROVISIONS OF GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS ACTS APPLY. Unless explicitly stated otherwise, the provisions relating to limitations, reporting, or transfer of Chapter 1170 (H.B. 1), Acts of the 88th Legislature, Regular Session, 2023 (the General Appropriations Act), and Chapter 1185 (S.B. 1), Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025 (the General Appropriations Act), apply to the appropriations made by this Act. SECTION 6.  EFFECTIVE DATE. (a) Subject to Subsection (b) of this section, this Act takes effect September 1, 2025. (b)  This Act takes effect only if it receives a vote of two-thirds of the members present in each house of the legislature, as provided by Section 49-g(m), Article III, Texas Constitution.